Idaho statutes. Title 15 UNIFORM PROBATE CODE
Part 1
General Provisions

§ 15-3-101. Devolution of estate at death — Restrictions.

The power of a person to leave property by will, and the rights of creditors, devisees, and heirs to his property are subject to the restrictions and limitations contained in this code to facilitate the prompt settlement of estates. Upon the death of a person, his separate property devolves to the persons to whom it is devised by his last will, or to those indicated as substitutes for them in cases involving lapse, renunciation or other circumstances affecting the devolution of testate estates, or in the absence of testamentary disposition to his heirs, or to those indicated as substitutes for them in cases involving renunciation or other circumstances affecting the devolution of intestate estates, and upon the death of a husband or wife, the decedent’s share of their community property devolves to the persons to whom it is devised by his last will, or in the absence of testamentary disposition, to the surviving spouse, but all of their community property which is under the management and control of the decedent is subject to his debts and administration, and that portion of their community property which is not under the management and control of the decedent but which is necessary to carry out the provisions of his will is subject to administration; but the devolution of all the above described property is subject to rights to homestead allowance, exempt property, to renunciation to rights of creditors, elective share of the surviving spouse and to administration.

§ 15-3-102. Necessity of order of probate for will.

Except as provided in section 15-3-1201[, Idaho Code,] of this code, to be effective to prove the transfer of any property or to nominate an executor, a will must be declared to be valid by an order of informal probate by the registrar, or an adjudication of probate by the court, except that a duly executed and unrevoked will which has not been probated may be admitted as evidence of a devise if (1) no court proceeding concerning the succession or administration of the estate has occurred, and (2) either the devisee or his successors and assigns possessed the property devised in accordance with the provisions of the will, or the property devised was not possessed or claimed by anyone by virtue of the decedent’s title during the time period for testacy proceedings.

§ 15-3-103. Necessity of appointment for administration.

Except as otherwise provided in chapter 4[, title 5, Idaho Code,] of this code, to acquire the powers and undertake the duties and liabilities of a personal representative of a decedent, a person must be appointed by order of the court or registrar, qualify and be issued letters. Administration of an estate is commenced by the issuance of letters.

§ 15-3-104. Claims against decedent — Necessity of administration.

No proceeding to enforce a claim against the estate of a decedent or his successors may be revived or commenced before the appointment of a personal representative. After the appointment and until distribution, all proceedings and actions to enforce a claim against the estate are governed by the procedure prescribed by this chapter. After distribution a creditor whose claim has not been barred may recover from the distributees as provided in section 15-3-1004[, Idaho Code,] of this code or from a former personal representative individually liable as provided in section 15-3-1005[, Idaho Code,] of this code. This section has no application to a proceeding by a secured creditor of the decedent to enforce his right to his security except as to any deficiency judgment which might be sought therein.

§ 15-3-105. Proceedings affecting devolution and administration — Jurisdiction of subject matter.

Persons interested in decedents’ estates may apply to the registrar for determination in the informal proceedings provided in this chapter, and may petition the court for orders in formal proceedings within the court’s jurisdiction including but not limited to those described in this chapter. The court has exclusive jurisdiction of formal proceedings to determine how decedents’ estates subject to the laws of this state are to be administered, expended and distributed.

§ 15-3-106. Civil litigation — Notice.

Subject to general rules concerning the proper location of civil litigation and jurisdiction of persons, the court may herein determine any other controversy concerning a succession or to which an estate, through a personal representative, may be a party. Persons notified are bound though less than all interested persons may have been given notice.

§ 15-3-107. Scope of proceedings — Proceedings independent — Exception.

Unless supervised administration as described in Part 5, chapter 3, [title 15, Idaho Code,] of this code is involved, (1) each proceeding before the court or registrar is independent of any other proceeding involving the same estate; (2) petitions for formal orders of the court may combine various requests for relief in a single proceeding if the orders sought may be finally granted without delay. Except as required for proceedings which are particularly described by other sections of this chapter, no petition is defective because it fails to embrace all matters which might then be the subject of a final order; (3) proceedings for probate of wills or adjudications of no will may be combined with proceedings for appointment of personal representatives; and (4) a proceeding for appointment of a personal representative is concluded by an order making or declining the appointment.

§ 15-3-108. Probate — Testacy and appointment proceedings — Ultimate time limit.

No informal probate or appointment proceeding or formal testacy or appointment proceeding, other than a proceeding to probate a will previously probated at the testator’s domicile and appointment proceedings relating to an estate in which there has been a prior appointment or proceedings under section 15-3-1201, Idaho Code, or section 15-3-1205, Idaho Code, may be commenced more than three (3) years after the decedent’s death, except:

If a previous proceeding was dismissed because of doubt about the fact of the decedent’s death, appropriate probate, appointment or testacy proceedings may be maintained at any time thereafter upon a finding that the decedent’s death occurred prior to the initiation of the previous proceeding and the applicant or petitioner has not delayed unduly in initiating the subsequent proceeding;

Appropriate probate, appointment or testacy proceedings may be maintained in relation to the estate of an absent, disappeared or missing person for whose estate a conservator has been appointed, at any time within three (3) years after the conservator becomes able to establish the death of the protected person; and

A proceeding to contest an informally probated will and to secure appointment of the person with legal priority for appointment in the event the contest is successful, may be commenced within the later of twelve (12) months from the informal probate or three (3) years from the decedent’s death.

These limitations do not apply to proceedings to construe probated wills or determine heirs of an intestate or to proceedings under section 15-3-1201, Idaho Code, or section 15-3-1205, Idaho Code. In cases under subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the date on which a testacy or appointment proceeding is properly commenced shall be deemed to be the date of the decedent’s death for purposes of other limitations provisions of this code which relate to the date of death.

§ 15-3-109. Statutes of limitation on decedent’s cause of action.

No statute of limitation running on a cause of action belonging to a decedent which had not been barred as of the date of his death, shall apply to bar a cause of action surviving the decedent’s death sooner than four (4) months after death. A cause of action which, but for this section, would have been barred less than four (4) months after death, is barred after four (4) months unless tolled.

§ 15-3-110. Delivery of will. [Repealed.]

§ 15-3-111. Joint probate on death of survivor of marriage dissolved by death.

In cases in which a marital community has been dissolved by the death of either spouse at any time, the survivor was then entitled to all of the property of the decedent by will, law, or both, and the survivor died before any proceeding had been commenced for the probate of the estate of the spouse whose death occurred first, the estates of both decedents may be joined for probate in a single proceeding in any court having jurisdiction of the estate of the spouse whose death occurred last. The three (3) year provision of section 15-3-108, Idaho Code, applies only to the death of the spouse whose death occurred last. The initial application or petition filed in any such joint proceeding shall contain a statement of the facts upon which such joint proceeding is based, in addition to all other statements required by this code to be made therein.